Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.831

Definitions.

In this article:

(1) "Dissenter" means a partner who is entitled to dissent from a plan of merger and who exercises that right when and in the manner required by this article.

(2) "Fair value," with respect to a dissenter's partnership interest, means the value of the partnership interest immediately before the effectuation of the merger to which the dissenter objects, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the merger unless exclusion would be inequitable.

(3) "Interest" means interest from the effective date of the merger until the date of payment, at the average rate currently paid by the limited partnership on its principal bank loans or, if none, at a rate that is fair and equitable under all the circumstances.

(4) "Limited partnership" means the domestic limited partnership in which the dissenter holds or held a partnership interest, or the surviving organization, whether foreign or domestic, of that limited partnership.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1201.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).